Alaska statutes. Title 34. Property.
Article 6. Landlord Remedies.

Sec. 34.03.220.
Noncompliance with rental agreement; failure to pay rent.

Except as provided in this chapter,

if the tenant or someone in the tenant’s control deliberately inflicts substantial damage to the premises in breach of AS

34.03.120

(a)(5) or the tenant engages in or permits another to engage in prostitution or another illegal activity at the premises in breach of AS

34.03.120

(b), the landlord may deliver a written notice to quit to the tenant under AS

09.45.100

—

09.45.105

specifying the act or activity constituting the breach and specifying that the rental agreement will terminate on a date that is not less than 24 hours or more than five days after service of the notice; for purposes of this paragraph, damage to premises is “substantial” if the loss, destruction, or defacement of property attributable to the deliberate infliction of damage to the premises exceeds $400;

if there is a material noncompliance by the tenant with the rental agreement, or if there is noncompliance with AS 34.03.120, other than deliberate infliction of substantial damage to the premises or other than noncompliance as to a utility service for which the provisions of (e) of this section apply, materially affecting health and safety, the landlord may deliver a written notice to quit to the tenant under AS

09.45.100

—

09.45.110

specifying the acts and omissions constituting the breach and specifying that the rental agreement will terminate on a date not less than 10 days after service of the notice; if the breach is not remedied, the rental agreement terminates as provided in the notice subject to the provisions of this section; if the breach is remediable by repairs or the payment of damages or otherwise and the tenant adequately remedies the breach before the date specified in the notice, the rental agreement will not terminate; in the absence of due care by the tenant, if substantially the same act or omission that constituted a prior noncompliance of which notice was given recurs within six months, the landlord may terminate the rental agreement upon at least five days’ written notice to quit specifying the breach and the date of termination of the rental agreement.

If rent is unpaid when due and the tenant fails to pay rent in full within seven days after written notice by the landlord of nonpayment and the intention to terminate the rental agreement if the rent is not paid within that period of time, the tenancy terminates unless the landlord agrees to allow the tenant to remain in occupancy, and the landlord may terminate the rental agreement and immediately recover possession of the rental unit. Only one written notice of default need be given the tenant by the landlord as to any one default. A landlord who has given written notice to the tenant under this subsection may accept a partial payment of the rent due under the rental agreement and extend the date for the eviction accordingly.

Except as provided in this chapter, the landlord may recover actual damages and obtain injunctive relief for any noncompliance by the tenant with the rental agreement or AS

34.03.120

.

An order of abatement entered by a court under AS

09.50.170

terminates a rental agreement on the premises subject to the order of abatement.

If a public utility providing electricity, natural gas, or water to the premises occupied by the tenant discontinues the service to the premises due to the failure of the tenant to pay for the utility service, the landlord may deliver a written notice to quit to the tenant advising that, notwithstanding (a) of this section, the tenancy will terminate five days after the landlord’s service of the notice. If, within three days from the service of the notice, the tenant reinstates the discontinued service and repays the landlord for any amounts paid by the landlord to reinstate service, and if damage did not occur to the rental unit as a result of the discontinuance of service, the rental agreement will not terminate. However, in the absence of due care by the tenant, if substantially the same act or omission that constituted a prior noncompliance under this subsection for which notice was given recurs within six months, the landlord may terminate the rental agreement upon at least three days’ written notice specifying the breach and the date of termination of the rental agreement.

A person whose use of premises is based solely on rights acquired by a tenant, and who has not individually acquired the rights of a tenant under this chapter, does not acquire rights under this chapter as a result of being present on the premises.

History.

(§ 1 ch 10 SLA 1974; am §§ 24 — 26 ch 121 SLA 1994; am § 11 ch 27 SLA 2014)

Editor’s notes. —

Sec. 13, ch. 27, SLA 2014 provides that the changes to (a) of this section made in that act “apply to a residential rental agreement for a period beginning on or after September 15, 2014.”

Sec. 34.03.225.
Limitations on mobile home park operator’s right to terminate.

A mobile home park operator may evict a mobile home or a mobile home park dweller or tenant only for one of the following reasons:

the mobile home dweller or tenant has defaulted in the payment of rent owed;

the mobile home dweller or tenant has been convicted of violating a federal or state law or local ordinance, and that violation is continuing and is detrimental to the health, safety, or welfare of other dwellers or tenants in the mobile home park;

the mobile home dweller or tenant has violated a provision, enforceable under AS

34.03.130

, of the rental agreement or lease signed by both parties and not prohibited by law including rent and the terms of agreement; and

a change in the use of the land comprising the mobile home park, or the portion of it on which the mobile home to be evicted is located; however, all dwellers or tenants so affected by a change in land use shall be given at least 270 days’ notice, or longer if a longer notice period is provided in a valid lease or required by a municipality; a dweller or tenant so affected by a change in land use shall be given a quit date not earlier than May 1 and not later than October 15; a municipality may establish a mobile home relocation fund and require that a dweller or tenant so affected by a change in land use be given a longer notice period or compensated from the fund for the cost of disconnecting, relocating, and reestablishing the dweller’s or tenant’s mobile home.

A mobile home park operator may not evict a mobile home or a mobile home park dweller or tenant because of the age of the mobile home, except that a mobile home or a mobile home park dweller or tenant may be evicted if, when the mobile home was admitted to the mobile home park, a regulation of the mobile home park limiting the age of a mobile home in the mobile home park was in effect, the mobile home is sold after the age limitation has been exceeded, and the owner or tenant of the mobile home has failed to bring the unit into compliance with the life safety requirements of 24 C.F.R. Part 3280. This does not prohibit eviction for violation of a provision enforceable under AS

34.03.130

that requires that a mobile home be in a fit and habitable condition.

When, under (a) of this section, a mobile home park owner is required to give notice to evict a mobile home owner or a mobile home park dweller or tenant, provision of notice to quit under AS

09.45.100

—

09.45.105

satisfies the requirement of notice.

History.

(§ 5 ch 138 SLA 1976; am § 1 ch 48 SLA 1982; am §§ 1, 2 ch 13 SLA 1986; am § 27 ch 121 SLA 1994; am § 1 ch 35 SLA 2002)

Legislative history reports. —

For report on § 5, ch. 138, SLA 1976 (SCS CSHB 829 am S [re-engrossed]), see 1976 Senate Journal, p. 1368.

Sec. 34.03.230.
Remedies for absence, nonuse and abandonment.

When the rental agreement requires the tenant to give notice to the landlord of an anticipated extended absence in excess of seven days as required in AS

34.03.150

and the tenant wilfully fails to do so, the landlord may recover an amount not to exceed one and one-half times the actual damages.

During an absence of the tenant in excess of seven days, the landlord may enter the dwelling unit at times reasonably necessary as provided in AS

34.03.140

. The landlord may reenter the dwelling unit and, if there is evidence that the tenant has abandoned the dwelling unit, unless the landlord and tenant have made a specific agreement to the contrary, the landlord may terminate the rental agreement.

If the tenant abandons the dwelling unit, the landlord shall make reasonable efforts to rent it at a fair rental value. If the landlord rents the dwelling unit for a term beginning before the expiration of the rental agreement, the agreement is considered terminated on the date the new tenancy begins. The rental agreement is considered terminated by the landlord on the date the landlord has notice of the abandonment if the landlord fails to use reasonable efforts to rent the dwelling unit at a fair rental value or if the landlord accepts the abandonment as a surrender. If the tenancy is from month to month, or week to week, the term of the rental agreement for purposes of this section shall be considered a month or a week, as the case may be.

History.

(§ 1 ch 10 SLA 1974; am § 28 ch 121 SLA 1994)

Sec. 34.03.240.
Waiver of landlord’s right to terminate.

Acceptance of rent with knowledge of a default by the tenant or acceptance of performance by the tenant that varies from the terms of the rental agreement or rules or regulations subsequently adopted by the landlord constitutes a waiver of the right of the landlord to terminate the rental agreement for that breach, unless otherwise agreed after the breach has occurred.

History.

(§ 1 ch 10 SLA 1974)

Sec. 34.03.250.
Landlord liens; distraint for rent abolished.

A lien or security interest on behalf of the landlord in the tenant’s household goods is not enforceable unless perfected before March 19, 1974.

Distraint for rent is abolished.

History.

(§ 1 ch 10 SLA 1974)

Sec. 34.03.260.
Disposition of abandoned property.

Except as otherwise agreed, if, upon termination of a tenancy including but not limited to a termination after expiration of a lease or by surrender or abandonment of the premises, a tenant has left personal property upon the premises, and the landlord reasonably believes that the tenant has abandoned this personal property, the landlord may

give notice to the tenant demanding that the property be removed within the dates set out in the notice but not less than 15 days after delivery or mailing of the notice, and that if the property is not removed within the time specified, the property may be sold; if the property is not removed within the time specified in the notice, the landlord may sell the property at a public sale; the landlord may dispose of perishable commodities in any manner the landlord considers fit;

if the tenant has left personal property that is reasonably determined by the landlord to be valueless or of such little value that the cost of storing and conducting a public sale would probably exceed the amount that would be realized from the sale, the landlord may notify the tenant that the property be removed within the date specified in the notice but not less than 15 days after delivery or mailing of the notice, and that if the property is not removed within the time specified, the landlord intends to destroy or otherwise dispose of the property; if the property is not removed within the time specified in the notice, the landlord may destroy or otherwise dispose of the property; in the notice, the landlord shall indicate an election to sell certain items of the tenant’s personal property at public sale and to destroy or otherwise dispose of the remainder.

After notice as provided in (a) of this section, the landlord shall store all personal property of the tenant in a place of safekeeping and shall exercise reasonable care of the property, but is not responsible to the tenant for loss not caused by the landlord’s deliberate or negligent act. The landlord may elect to store the property on the premises previously demised, in which event the storage cost may not exceed the fair rental value of the premises. If the tenant’s property is removed to a commercial storage company, the storage cost shall include the actual charge for the storage and removal from the premises to the place of storage.

After landlord’s notice under (a) of this section, or otherwise, if the tenant makes timely response in writing of an intention to remove the personal property from the premises and does not do so within the time specified in the landlord’s notice or within 15 days of the delivery or mailing of the tenant’s written response whichever is later, it shall be conclusively presumed that the tenant has abandoned the property. If the tenant removes the property after notice, the landlord is entitled to the cost of storage for the period the property has remained in the landlord’s safekeeping.

The landlord is not liable in damages in an action by a tenant claiming loss by reason of the landlord’s storage, destruction, or disposition of property under this section. A landlord who deliberately or negligently violates the provisions of this section is liable for actual damages and penal damages of an amount not to exceed actual damages.

A public sale authorized under this section shall be conducted under AS

09.35.140

. The landlord may dispose of any property upon which no bid is made at the public sale.

History.

(§ 1 ch 10 SLA 1974; am § 29 ch 121 SLA 1994)

Sec. 34.03.270.
Remedy after termination.

If the rental agreement is terminated, the landlord may have a claim for possession and for rent and a separate claim for actual damages for breach of the rental agreement.

History.

(§ 1 ch 10 SLA 1974)

Sec. 34.03.280.
Recovery of possession limited.

A landlord may not recover or take possession of the dwelling unit by action or otherwise, including wilful diminution of services to the tenant by interrupting or causing the interruption of electricity, gas, water, sanitary, or other essential services to the tenant, except in case of abandonment, surrender, circumstances beyond the control of the landlord due to energy conditions, or as permitted in this chapter.

History.

(§ 1 ch 10 SLA 1974)

Sec. 34.03.285.
Service of process upon tenant.

In an action for possession under this chapter, the summons and complaint shall be served under the provisions of Rule No. 85 of the Rules of Civil Procedure.
A continuance may not be granted plaintiff or defendant except for good cause shown.

History.

(§ 2 ch 10 SLA 1974)

Revisor’s notes. —

Formerly AS 09.45.496(a).
Renumbered in 1983.